Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2417
Controlled
substance; exemption.

Any emergency box containing
a controlled substance listed in section 28-405 and maintained at a long-term
care facility shall be exempt from subsection (3) of section 28-414.03.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 189;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 38;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 59;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 72;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 74;

Laws 2014, LB811, § 27.